Mississippi, session 2026, SB3337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the City of Horn Lake, Mississippi, for the purpose of defraying costs associated with certain infrastructure projects for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.... $ 5,200,000.00. SECTION 2.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 1 of this act, the following amounts are to be allocated as follows: To defray costs of repair and resurfacing city streets................ $   500,000.00. To defray costs of water infrastructure hardening.............................. $ 250,000.00. To defray costs of sewer and drainage improvements.................. $   750,000.00. To defray costs of residential park improvements and upgrades............... $   150,000.00. To defray costs of sidewalk expansion and improvement........................ $ 200,000.00. To defray costs of design and construction of the Horn Lake Community Center.................. $ 1,000,000.00. To defray costs of the construction of a replacement facility for Fire Station Number 1....................... $ 1,000,000.00. To defray costs of the construction of a modern public works facility............................... $ 600,000.00. To defray costs of public works equipment replacement.................. $   200,000.00. To defray costs of establishing a centralized facility for environmental waste disposal............ $   300,000.00. To defray costs of installing mast arms for traffic signals and deploying uniform street signage across the city................ $   250,000.00. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.